Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-2303
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 19-2301 to 19-2304, unless the context otherwise requires: Proceeds shall mean any money collected from or by reason of parking meters or other similar mechanical devices installed by any city of the first class, city of the second class, or village, including revenue received by reason of any schedule of accelerated charges, to be fixed by ordinance. Accelerated charges may include, but need not be limited to, charges fixed by ordinance for parking in controlled or regulated areas without payment in advance of required parking fees or payments, but shall not include judicially imposed fines and penalties.

Laws 1955, c. 61, § 3, p. 193;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 140.